Connecticut, session 2026, SB00305.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to conduct a study relating to state-wide marketing and tourism
in the state. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, a review
of investment and participation in state-wide marketing and tourism in
the state for the purpose of positioning the state as a prime destination
for leisure and business travelers and encouraging strategic investment
in such sectors.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1) The
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
commerce, or their designees; (2) the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development, or the commissioner's designee; (3) the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's
designee; (4) an employee of the office of the Governor, appointed by
the Governor; (5) a member of the Connecticut Tourism Council,
appointed by its chairperson; and (6) any individuals the chairpersons
of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to commerce deem relevant and

Substitute Senate Bill No. 305
necessary to carry out the duties of the working group, including, but
not limited to, a member of the Arts, Culture and Tourism Legislative
Caucus, a member of one of the regional tourism districts in the state
and representatives of organizations that advocate for hospitality,
lodging or restaurant businesses in the state.
(c) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to commerce, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date
that it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Special Act No. 26-24 2 of 2